Hawaii statutes.
[§166-1] Legislative findings. The
legislature finds that important agricultural lands should be preserved for
productive purposes; the contribution of diversified agriculture and
aquaculture to export and local markets should be expanded, thereby increasing
its importance in the State's economy; and continued use of the State's
agricultural land resources should be ensured by providing lands to new
farmers, displaced farmers, and other qualified farmers. In order to meet
these goals, the objectives of the State shall include the provision of: lands
of appropriate size and productive potential, with an adequate supply of water,
to ensure economically viable farm operations; lands at reasonable cost with
long term tenure and security from urbanization pressure; and lands with common
facilities and activities to encourage farm production and distribution
economies. [L 1986, c 222, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next